Hawaii statutes.
§88-171 Public hearings; notice. All
adjudications by the board of trustees required by this part in connection with
applications for pensions, revocations of pensions, or otherwise, shall be made
by the board only after public hearings, public notice of which shall be given
by the board at least once at least ten days before the date of hearing, and
actual notice of which shall be given to the person concerned, if available,
which notice shall specifically state that the person interested shall have the
right to be present in person or by representative and to be represented by
counsel. [L 1933, c 46, §6; RL 1935, §7914; RL 1945, §6183; RL 1955, §6-151;
HRS §88-171; am L 1998, c 2, §26]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next